Utah statutes.
72-9-701.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.
(1)  Unless otherwise specified, any person who violates a provision of this
chapter or who aids or abets another person in a violation of this chapter is
guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(2)  A second or subsequent conviction for a violation of this chapter or of
aiding or abetting another person in a violation of this chapter is a class A
misdemeanor.
